Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 6. Authority of Local Governing Bodies.
§ 3.2-6542.
Establishment of Dangerous Dog Registry.

The Commissioner shall establish the Virginia Dangerous Dog Registry to be maintained by the Department. The State Veterinarian shall maintain information provided and posted by animal control officers or other such officials statewide on a website. All information collected for the Dangerous Dog Registry shall be available to animal control officers via the website. The website list shall be known as the Virginia Dangerous Dog Registry.

Registration information shall include the name of the animal, a photograph, sex, age, weight, primary breed, secondary breed, color and markings, whether spayed or neutered, the acts that resulted in the dog being designated as dangerous and associated trial docket information, microchip or tattoo number, address where the animal is maintained, name of the owner, address of the owner, telephone numbers of the owner, and a statement that the owner has complied with the provisions of the dangerous dog order. The address of the owner along with the name and breed of the dangerous dog, the acts that resulted in the dog being found dangerous, and information necessary to access court records of the adjudication shall be available to the general public. If the dangerous dog is moved to a different location or contact information for the owner changes in any way at any time, the owner shall submit a renewal containing the address of the new location or other updated information within 10 days of such move or change to an animal control officer or other such official for the new location. There shall be no charge for any updated information provided between renewals.

Each county or city shall submit to the State Veterinarian by January 31 of each year $90 for each dangerous dog it initially registered and $25 for each dangerous dog for which it renewed registration within the previous calendar year. Any funds collected pursuant to this section shall be used by the State Veterinarian to maintain the registry and website.

Actions of the Department relating to the establishment, operation, and maintenance of the Virginia Dangerous Dog Registry under this section or §

3.2-6542.1

shall be exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

Copies of all records, documents, and other papers pertaining to the Dangerous Dog Registry that are duly certified and authenticated in writing on the face of such documents to be true copies by the State Veterinarian or the Dangerous Dog Registry administrator shall be received as evidence with like effect as the original records, documents, or other papers in all courts of the Commonwealth.

History.

2006, cc. 837, 864, 898, § 3.1-796.93:3; 2008, c. 860; 2009, c. 354; 2012, cc. 107, 236; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 354 added the last paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 107 and 236 are identical, and deleted “Commonwealth of” preceding “Virginia Dangerous Dog Registry” in the first and next-to-last paragraphs; and in the first paragraph, combined the former first and second sentences into the present first sentence by substituting “Animal Care and Health Policy” for “Veterinary Services. Each owner of any canine or canine crossbreed found by any appropriate court to be a dangerous dog shall be required to register the animal as a dangerous dog within 45 days of such finding,” substituted “maintain information provided and posted by animal control officers or” for “receive, post, and maintain the information provided by the owner, animal control officers, and” in the present second sentence, inserted “information” near the beginning of the present fourth sentence, inserted “to an animal control officer or other designated local official of the county or city in which he currently resides” in the present sixth sentence, deleted the former eighth sentence, which read: “The owner shall submit to the State Veterinarian a $100 initial registration fee and a $35 renewal registration fee,” inserted the present eighth sentence, added “to an animal control officer or other such official for the new location” at the end of the present ninth sentence, and inserted the present eleventh sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 464, effective July 1, 2021, added the subsection designations, in subsection A, deleted “Office of Animal Care and Health Policy” at the end of the first sentence, and added the fourth sentence; in subsection B, substituted “found dangerous” for “deemed dangerous” in the second sentence, deleted the former third through fifth sentences, which read: “By January 31 of each year, until such time as the dangerous dog is deceased, the owner shall submit to an animal control officer or other designated local official of the county or city in which he currently resides a renewal registration that shall include all information contained in the original registration and any updates. The owner shall verify the information is accurate by annual resubmissions. The animal control officer or other such official shall post any updates on the website,” and substituted “If” for “In the event that” in the next-to-last sentence; in subsection C, substituted “county or city” for “county and city” in the first sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The website list shall be known as the Virginia Dangerous Dog Registry”; and inserted “or §

3.2-6542.1

” in subsection D.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 83 (2006).

§ 3.2-6542.1.
Renewal of dangerous dog registration.

By January 31 of each year, until the animal is deceased, the owner of an animal found to be a dangerous dog pursuant to §

3.2-6540

shall update and renew the dangerous dog registration certificate obtained pursuant to §

3.2-6540.01

for a fee of $85 in the same manner as the initial certificate was obtained. However, if the dangerous dog adjudication occurred within 60 days of the end of the calendar year, the first renewal shall be included in the initial registration at no additional charge to the owner.

Prior to the renewal date of a dangerous dog registration each year, a local animal control officer shall conduct an inspection of the dangerous dog and the premises on which it is kept, and no certificate of renewal shall be issued without such inspection. The animal control officer shall post registration information on the Virginia Dangerous Dog Registry established by §

3.2-6542

.

No dangerous dog registration certificate required to be obtained under this section shall be issued to any person who is younger than 18 years of age or who fails to present satisfactory evidence of (i) compliance with the provisions of §§

3.2-6540

,

3.2-6540

.01,

3.2-6540.02

,

3.2-6540.03

, and

3.2-6540.04

; (ii) the animal’s current rabies vaccination, if applicable; and (iii) a current county or city dog license, as appropriate.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 3.2-6542.2.
Dangerous dog fees; local fund.

All fees collected by a locality pursuant to §

3.2-6540

,

3.2-6540

.01,

3.2-6540.02

,

3.2-6540.03

,

3.2-6540.04

,

3.2-6542

, or

3.2-6542

.1, less the costs incurred by the animal control officer in producing and distributing any certificate or tag required by such section and any fees due to the Department for maintenance of the Virginia Dangerous Dog Registry established by § 3.2-6542, shall be paid into a special dedicated fund in the treasury of the locality for the purpose of paying the expenses of any training course required under §

3.2-6556

.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 3.2-6543.
Governing body of any locality may adopt certain ordinances.

The governing body of any locality of the Commonwealth may adopt, and make more stringent, ordinances that parallel §§

3.2-6521

through

3.2-6539

,

3.2-6546

through

3.2-6555

,

3.2-6562

,

3.2-6569

,

3.2-6570

,

3.2-6574

through

3.2-6580

, and

3.2-6585

through

3.2-6590

. Any town may choose to adopt by reference any ordinance of the surrounding county adopted under this section to be applied within its town limits, in lieu of adopting an ordinance of its own.Any funds collected pursuant to the enforcement of ordinances adopted pursuant to the provisions of this section may be used for the purpose of defraying the costs of local animal control, including efforts to promote sterilization of cats and dogs.

Any locality may, by ordinance, establish uniform schedules of civil penalties for violations of specific provisions of ordinances adopted pursuant to this section. Civil penalties may not be imposed for violations of ordinances that parallel §

3.2-6570

. Designation of a particular violation for a civil penalty shall be in lieu of criminal sanctions and preclude prosecution of such violation as a criminal misdemeanor. The schedule for civil penalties shall be uniform for each type of specified violation and the penalty for any one violation shall not be more than $150. Imposition of civil penalties shall not preclude an action for injunctive, declaratory or other equitable relief. Moneys raised pursuant to this subsection shall be placed in the locality’s general fund.An animal control officer or law-enforcement officer may issue a summons for a violation. Any person summoned or issued a ticket for a scheduled violation may make an appearance in person or in writing by mail to the department of finance or the treasurer of the locality issuing the summons or ticket prior to the date fixed for trial in court. Any person so appearing may enter a waiver of trial, admit liability, and pay the civil penalty established for the offense charged.

History.

1976, c. 182, § 15.1-29.1:1; 1984, c. 492, § 29-213.64; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.94; 1993, c. 959; 1994, cc. 115, 630; 1995, c. 832; 1997, c. 587; 1998, c. 817; 2005, c. 304; 2008, c. 860; 2009, c. 107.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 107, effective February 25, 2009, added the last sentence in the first paragraph of subsection A.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Local restrictions on adoption of animals. —

A locality may adopt an ordinance that authorizes a pound to initiate and enforce policies that place restrictions or requirements upon the adoption of animals beyond those required by §

3.2-6546

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Morgan Griffith, Member, House of Delegates, 09-100, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 3 (1/13/10).

Trap-Neuter-Release program. —

A locality lawfully may operate a capture and sterilization program for the purpose of controlling a population of feral cats. The feral cats may be captured in a humane fashion, and such captured cats may be sterilized by a licensed veterinarian. The feral cats, however, may not be released by the locality back to the location from whence they came or some other location in the wild. Persons who capture feral cats while acting as agents of or in conjunction with a locality as part of its trap and sterilize program are companion animal finders and do not become the
de facto
or

de jure

owners of such cats. See opinion of Attorney General to Douglas W. Napier, Esquire, Town Attorney, Town of Front Royal, 12-100, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 52 (7/12/13).

Authority of animal control officer. —

An animal control officer is under a duty to remove an unlicensed companion animal from a property owner’s property upon complaint from the property owner, where the animal is not owned by the property owner. If the companion animal is licensed, the officer has the discretion, but not the duty, to capture and confine it. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert D. Orrock, Sr., Member, Virginia House of Delegates, The Honorable Adam P. Ebbin, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 15-016, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 30 (10/2/15).

§ 3.2-6543.1.
Authority to enact parallel dangerous dog ordinance.

The governing body of any locality may enact an ordinance regulating dangerous dogs that is parallel to §

3.2-6540

,

3.2-6540

.01,

3.2-6540.02

,

3.2-6540.03

, or

3.2-6540.04

. No locality shall impose a felony penalty for violation of such ordinance.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 3.2-6544.
Regulation of keeping of animals and fowl.

Any locality may, for the preservation of public health, regulate by ordinance the keeping of animals or fowl, other than dogs and cats, within a certain distance of residences or other buildings or wells, springs, streams, creeks, or brooks, and provide that all or certain of such animals shall not be kept within certain areas.

Any locality may, by ordinance, prohibit cruelty to and abuse of animals and fowl; and may regulate or prohibit the running at large and the keeping of animals and fowl and provide for the impounding and confiscation of any such animal or fowl found at large or kept in violation of such regulations. Any such ordinance may require that owners of any exotic or poisonous animal found running at large pay a fee to cover the locality’s actual cost in locating and capturing or otherwise disposing of the animal.

History.

Code 1950 §§ 15-20.1, 15-20.2; 1952, c. 694; 1954, c. 94; 1962, c. 623, §§ 15.1-517, 15.1-870; 1997, cc. 411, 587, § 3.1-796.94:1; 1999, c. 663; 2008, c. 860.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

18 M.J. Trespass, § 1.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Local ordinances found constitutional. —

A local ordinance that prohibits the owner of agricultural animals from allowing such animals to run at large in the locality is constitutional under the constitutions of Virginia and of the United States. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Christopher K. Peace, Member, House of Delegates, 11-065, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 35 (6/22/11).

§ 3.2-6545.
Regulation of sale of animals procured from animal shelters.

Any locality that maintains or supports, in whole or in part, a public or private animal shelter may by ordinance provide that no person who acquires an animal from such shelter shall be able to sell the animal within a period of six months from the time the animal is acquired from the shelter. Violation of the ordinance is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1972, c. 347, § 15.1-517.1; 1997, c. 587, § 3.1-796.94:2; 2008, c. 860; 2014, c. 148.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 148 substituted “public or private” for “pound or” and deleted “pound or” following “animal from such.”

§ 3.2-6546.
County or city public animal shelters; confinement and disposition of animals; affiliation with foster care providers; penalties; injunctive relief.

For purposes of this section:

“Animal” shall not include agricultural animals.

“Rightful owner” means a person with a right of property in the animal.

The governing body of each county or city shall maintain or cause to be maintained a public animal shelter and shall require dogs running at large without the tag required by §

3.2-6531

or in violation of an ordinance passed pursuant to §

3.2-6538

to be confined therein. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit confinement of other companion animals in such a shelter. The governing body of any county or city need not own the facility required by this section but may contract for its establishment with a private group or in conjunction with one or more other local governing bodies. The governing body shall require that:

The public animal shelter shall be accessible to the public at reasonable hours during the week;

The public animal shelter shall obtain a signed statement from each of its directors, operators, staff, or animal caregivers specifying that each individual has never been convicted of animal cruelty, neglect, or abandonment, and each shelter shall update such statement as changes occur;

If a person contacts the public animal shelter inquiring about a lost companion animal, the shelter shall advise the person if the companion animal is confined at the shelter or if a companion animal of similar description is confined at the shelter;

The public animal shelter shall maintain a written record of the information on each companion animal submitted to the shelter by a private animal shelter in accordance with subsection D of §

3.2-6548

for a period of 30 days from the date the information is received by the shelter. If a person contacts the shelter inquiring about a lost companion animal, the shelter shall check its records and make available to such person any information submitted by a private animal shelter or allow such person inquiring about a lost animal to view the written records;

The public animal shelter shall maintain a written record of the information on each companion animal submitted to the shelter by a releasing agency other than a public or private animal shelter in accordance with subdivision F 2 of §

3.2-6549

for a period of 30 days from the date the information is received by the shelter. If a person contacts the shelter inquiring about a lost companion animal, the shelter shall check its records and make available to such person any information submitted by such releasing agency or allow such person inquiring about a lost companion animal to view the written records; and

The public animal shelter shall maintain a written record of the information on each companion animal submitted to the shelter by an individual in accordance with subdivision A 2 of §

3.2-6551

for a period of 30 days from the date the information is received by the shelter. If a person contacts the shelter inquiring about a lost companion animal, the shelter shall check its records and make available to such person any information submitted by the individual or allow such person inquiring about a lost companion animal to view the written records.

An animal confined pursuant to this section shall be kept for a period of not less than five days, such stray hold period to commence on the day immediately following the day the animal is initially confined in the facility, unless sooner claimed by the rightful owner thereof.

The operator or custodian of the public animal shelter shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain whether the animal has a collar, tag, license, tattoo, or other form of identification, including by complying with the provisions of §

3.2-6585.1

. If such identification is found on the animal, the animal shall be held for an additional five-day stray hold period, unless sooner claimed by the rightful owner. If the rightful owner of the animal can be readily identified, the operator or custodian of the shelter shall make a reasonable effort to notify the owner of the animal’s confinement within the next 48 hours following its confinement.

During the stray hold period that an animal is confined pursuant to this subsection, the operator or custodian of the public animal shelter may vaccinate the animal to prevent the risk of communicable diseases, provided that (i) all vaccines are administered in accordance with a protocol approved by a licensed veterinarian and (ii) rabies vaccines are administered by a licensed veterinarian or licensed veterinary technician under the immediate direction and supervision of a licensed veterinarian in accordance with §

3.2-6521

. Indoor enclosures used to confine the animal during the applicable stray hold period shall be constructed of materials that are durable, nonporous, impervious to moisture, and able to be thoroughly cleaned and disinfected. During the applicable stray hold period, the operator or custodian shall provide the animal with adequate care, including reasonable access to outdoor areas to ensure that the animal has adequate exercise and adequate space.

If any animal confined pursuant to this section is claimed by its rightful owner, such owner may be charged with the actual expenses incurred in keeping the animal impounded. In addition to this and any other fees that might be levied, the locality may, after a public hearing, adopt an ordinance to charge the owner of an animal a fee for impoundment and increased fees for subsequent impoundments of the same animal.

If an animal confined pursuant to this section has not been claimed upon expiration of the applicable stray hold period as provided by subsection C, it shall be deemed abandoned and become the property of the public animal shelter.

For any animal not subject to a stray hold period, including an animal for whom the stray hold period has ended, the operator or custodian of the public animal shelter shall confine the animal in an enclosure that can safely house and allow for adequate separation of animals of different species, sexes, ages, and temperaments. Such enclosure may have both an outdoor area and an indoor area. If the facility has an outdoor area, the facility shall ensure that the outdoor areas do not present conditions that would be detrimental to the health of the animal. Indoor areas shall have a solid floor. Each operator or custodian shall ensure adequate access to water, food, and a resting platform, bedding, or perch as appropriate to the animal’s species, age, and condition. Any regulation by the Board that applies to an animal not subject to a stray hold period shall not be so restrictive as to fail to allow for adequate care, adequate exercise, and adequate space, including meaningful indoor and outdoor recreation for the animal.

Such animal may be euthanized in accordance with the methods approved by the State Veterinarian or disposed of by the methods set forth in subdivisions 1 through 5. No shelter shall release more than two animals or a family of animals during any 30-day period to any one person under subdivision 2, 3, or 4.

Release to any humane society, public or private animal shelter, or other releasing agency within the Commonwealth, provided that each humane society, animal shelter, or other releasing agency obtains a signed statement from each of its directors, operators, staff, or animal caregivers specifying that each individual has never been convicted of animal cruelty, neglect, or abandonment and updates such statements as changes occur;

Adoption by a resident of the county or city where the shelter is operated and who will pay the required license fee, if any, on such animal, provided that such resident has read and signed a statement specifying that he has never been convicted of animal cruelty, neglect, or abandonment;

Adoption by a resident of an adjacent political subdivision of the Commonwealth, if the resident has read and signed a statement specifying that he has never been convicted of animal cruelty, neglect, or abandonment;

Adoption by any other person, provided that such person has read and signed a statement specifying that he has never been convicted of animal cruelty, neglect, or abandonment and provided that no dog or cat may be adopted by any person who is not a resident of the county or city where the shelter is operated, or of an adjacent political subdivision, unless the dog or cat is first sterilized, and the shelter may require that the sterilization be done at the expense of the person adopting the dog or cat; or

Release for the purposes of adoption or euthanasia only, to an animal shelter, or any other releasing agency located in and lawfully operating under the laws of another state, provided that such animal shelter, or other releasing agency: (i) maintains records that would comply with §

3.2-6557

; (ii) requires that adopted dogs and cats be sterilized; (iii) obtains a signed statement from each of its directors, operators, staff, and animal caregivers specifying that each individual has never been convicted of animal cruelty, neglect, or abandonment, and updates such statement as changes occur; and (iv) has provided to the public or private animal shelter or other releasing agency within the Commonwealth a statement signed by an authorized representative specifying the entity’s compliance with clauses (i) through (iii), and the provisions of adequate care and performance of humane euthanasia, as necessary in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

For purposes of recordkeeping, release of an animal by a public animal shelter to a public or private animal shelter or other releasing agency shall be considered a transfer and not an adoption. If the animal is not first sterilized, the responsibility for sterilizing the animal transfers to the receiving entity.

Any proceeds deriving from the gift, sale, or delivery of such animals shall be paid directly to the treasurer of the locality. Any proceeds deriving from the gift, sale, or delivery of such animals by a public or private animal shelter or other releasing agency shall be paid directly to the clerk or treasurer of the animal shelter or other releasing agency for the expenses of the society and expenses incident to any agreement concerning the disposing of such animal. No part of the proceeds shall accrue to any individual except for the aforementioned purposes.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the immediate euthanasia of a critically injured, critically ill, or unweaned animal for humane purposes. Any animal euthanized pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be euthanized by one of the methods prescribed or approved by the State Veterinarian.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the immediate euthanasia or disposal by the methods listed in subdivisions D 1 through 5 of an animal that has been released to a public or private animal shelter, other releasing agency, or animal control officer by the animal’s rightful owner after the rightful owner has read and signed a statement: (i) surrendering all property rights in such animal; (ii) stating that no other person has a right of property in the animal; and (iii) acknowledging that the animal may be immediately euthanized or disposed of in accordance with subdivisions D 1 through 5.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit any feral dog or feral cat not bearing a collar, tag, tattoo, or other form of identification that, based on the written statement of a disinterested person, exhibits behavior that poses a risk of physical injury to any person confining the animal, from being euthanized after being kept for a period of not less than three days, at least one of which shall be a full business day, such period to commence on the day the animal is initially confined in the facility, unless sooner claimed by the rightful owner. The statement of the disinterested person shall be kept with the animal as required by §

3.2-6557

. For purposes of this subsection, a disinterested person shall not include a person releasing or reporting the animal.

No public animal shelter shall place a companion animal in a foster home with a foster care provider unless the foster care provider has read and signed a statement specifying that he has never been convicted of animal cruelty, neglect, or abandonment, and each shelter shall update such statement as changes occur. The shelter shall maintain the original statement and any updates to such statement in accordance with this chapter and for at least so long as the shelter has an affiliation with the foster care provider.

A public animal shelter that places a companion animal in a foster home with a foster care provider shall ensure that the foster care provider complies with §

3.2-6503

.

If a public animal shelter finds a direct and immediate threat to a companion animal placed with a foster care provider, it shall report its findings to the animal control agency in the locality where the foster care provider is located.

The governing body shall require that the public animal shelter be operated in accordance with regulations issued by the Board. If this chapter or such regulations are violated, the locality may be assessed a civil penalty by the Board or its designee in an amount that does not exceed $1,000 per violation. Each day of the violation is a separate offense. In determining the amount of any civil penalty, the Board or its designee shall consider (i) the history of previous violations at the shelter; (ii) whether the violation has caused injury to, death or suffering of, an animal; and (iii) the demonstrated good faith of the locality to achieve compliance after notification of the violation. All civil penalties assessed under this section shall be recovered in a civil action brought by the Attorney General in the name of the Commonwealth. Such civil penalties shall be paid into a special fund in the state treasury to the credit of the Department to be used in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

If this chapter or any laws governing public animal shelters are violated, the Commissioner may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of this chapter or the regulations pursuant thereto regarding public animal shelters, in the circuit court where the shelter is located. The Commissioner may request the Attorney General to bring such an action, when appropriate.

History.

1984, c. 492, §§ 29-213.36, 29-213.66; 1985, c. 21; 1987, c. 488, §§ 3.1-796.66, 3.1-796.96; 1988, c. 538; 1989, c. 344; 1991, c. 348; 1993, cc. 174, 817, 959; 1994, c. 936; 1995, c. 496; 1997, c. 159; 1998, c. 817; 1999, cc. 627, 672; 2000, c. 1010; 2002, cc. 53, 208, 787; 2003, c. 1007; 2008, cc. 345, 860; 2014, c. 148; 2018, c. 774; 2020, c. 1109; 2022, c. 387.

Cross references.

As to regulations of State Health Commissioner of covering local ordinances and requirements, see §

32.1-48.3

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 345 amended former § 3.1-796.96, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2008 amendment by c. 345 has been given effect in this section as set out above, by inserting the last sentence of the third paragraph of subsection C.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 148 substituted “public animal shelter” or “shelter” for “pound” and “public or private animal shelter” for “animal shelter” throughout the section; in subdivision B 4, substituted “shelter by a private animal shelter” for “pound by an animal shelter”; in subdivision B 5, substituted “public or private” for “pound or” in the first paragraph and substituted “public animal shelter to a public or private” for “pound to a pound” in the second paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 774 inserted the third paragraph in subsection C.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1109, in subsection C in the first paragraph, inserted “stray hold”; in the second paragraph, substituted “five-day stray hold period” for “five days” in the second sentence; and in the third paragraph, substituted “During the stray hold period” for “During the time” at the beginning of the first sentence and added the last two sentences; in subsection D in the first paragraph, substituted “applicable stray hold” for “appropriate holding,” added the second paragraph and in the last paragraph, substituted “subdivision 2, 3, or 4” for “subdivisions 2, 3, or 4” in the last sentence; and in subsection F, substituted “subdivisions D 1 through 5” for “subdivisions 1 through 5 of subsection D” once in the introductory wording and once in clause (iii).

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 387 inserted “including by complying with the provisions of §

3.2-6585.1

” in subsection C in the second paragraph; and made a stylistic change.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Records required to be maintained by companion animal facilities

are not authorized to be administered by private reporting services. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Russell Potts, Jr., Member, Senate of Virginia, 06-103 (1/30/07).

Official inspections of companion animal facilities

are not authorized to be conducted by private organizations. The State Veterinarian generally has the discretion to determine the time for and frequency of inspections of such facilities. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Russell Potts, Jr., Member, Senate of Virginia, 06-103 (1/30/07).

Operation of noncompliant facilities or the use of noncompliant procedures

to euthanize companion animals cannot be ignored by the State Veterinarian. The Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services or its designee has the discretion, but is not required, to assess civil fines for such noncompliant facilities or procedures; and the Commissioner may enjoin or shut down the operations of noncompliant facilities. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Russell Potts, Jr., Member, Senate of Virginia, 06-103 (1/30/07).

Local restrictions on adoption of animals. —

A locality may adopt an ordinance that authorizes a pound to initiate and enforce policies that place restrictions or requirements upon the adoption of animals beyond those required by §

3.2-6546

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Morgan Griffith, Member, House of Delegates, 09-100, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 3 (1/13/10).

Trap-Neuter-Release program. —

A locality lawfully may operate a capture and sterilization program for the purpose of controlling a population of feral cats. The feral cats may be captured in a humane fashion, and such captured cats may be sterilized by a licensed veterinarian. The feral cats, however, may not be released by the locality back to the location from whence they came or some other location in the wild. Persons who capture feral cats while acting as agents of or in conjunction with a locality as part of its trap and sterilize program are companion animal finders and do not become the
de facto
or

de jure

owners of such cats. See opinion of Attorney General to Douglas W. Napier, Esquire, Town Attorney, Town of Front Royal, 12-100, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 52 (7/12/13).

§ 3.2-6547.
Acceptance of animals for research or experimentation; prohibition.

No person shall use or accept for the purpose of medical research or experimentation any animal bearing a tag, license, or tattooed identification, unless the individual who owns such animal consents thereto in writing.

History.

1990, c. 904, § 3.1-796.96:1; 2008, c. 860.